trunk/incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
    <!-- 1. feminine -->
    <pardef n="lip/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- 2. feminine -->
    <pardef n="perut/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- 3. feminine -->
    <pardef n="mami__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mami</l>
          <r>mami<s n="n"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- 4. feminine -->
    <pardef n="dežurn/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lipa"><i>lip</i><par n="lip/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akumulativnost"><i>akumulativnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atraktivnost"><i>atraktivnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bistroumnost"><i>bistroumnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bogatost"><i>bogatost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cikličnost"><i>cikličnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobronamernost"><i>dobronamernost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drugačnost"><i>drugačnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enakost"><i>enakost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gibljivost"><i>gibljivost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grobost"><i>grobost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iniciativnost"><i>iniciativnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="izključljivost"><i>izključljivost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jasnost"><i>jasnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konkretnost"><i>konkretnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kritičnost"><i>kritičnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="likvidnost"><i>likvidnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miselnost"><i>miselnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="možnost"><i>možnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="namembnost"><i>namembnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neaktivnost"><i>neaktivnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neenakopravnost"><i>neenakopravnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nelagodnost"><i>nelagodnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nepismenost"><i>nepismenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neprilagojenost"><i>neprilagojenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nespečnost"><i>nespečnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neučinkovitost"><i>neučinkovitost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nezaposlenost"><i>nezaposlenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="notranjost"><i>notranjost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obstojnost"><i>obstojnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odličnost"><i>odličnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oglušelost"><i>oglušelost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="onesnaženost"><i>onesnaženost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="otopelost"><i>otopelost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perverznost"><i>perverznost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podvrženost"><i>podvrženost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ponižnost"><i>ponižnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potrebnost"><i>potrebnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poštenost"><i>poštenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prednost"><i>prednost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="preobremenjenost"><i>preobremenjenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prihodnost"><i>prihodnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primernost"><i>primernost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="privrženost"><i>privrženost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prostost"><i>prostost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="racionalnost"><i>racionalnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="razdvojenost"><i>razdvojenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="razvitost"><i>razvitost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="resnost"><i>resnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sebičnost"><i>sebičnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrivnost"><i>skrivnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solidarnost"><i>solidarnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sposobnost"><i>sposobnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storilnost"><i>storilnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="surovost"><i>surovost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tekmovalnost"><i>tekmovalnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tveganost"><i>tveganost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umrljivost"><i>umrljivost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="upravičenost"><i>upravičenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="usposobljenost"><i>usposobljenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vdanost"><i>vdanost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="večnost"><i>večnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrednost"><i>vrednost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vztrajnost"><i>vztrajnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zakonitost"><i>zakonitost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zasebnost"><i>zasebnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zatopljenost"><i>zatopljenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zgoščenost"><i>zgoščenost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="znanost"><i>znanost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="človečnost"><i>človečnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="živčnost"><i>živčnost</i><par n="perut/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mami"><i>mami</i><par n="mami__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dežurna"><i>dežurn</i><par n="dežurn/a__n"/></e>
